Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1084
Salon license; application; procedure; additional information.

Any person seeking a license to operate a salon shall submit a completed application at least thirty days before construction or remodeling of the building proposed for use is scheduled to begin. If no construction or remodeling is planned, the application shall be submitted at least thirty days before the proposed opening of the salon for operation. Along with the application the applicant shall submit:

(1) A detailed floor plan or blueprint of the proposed salon sufficient to demonstrate compliance with the requirements of section 38-1083; and

(2) Evidence of minimal property damage, bodily injury, and liability insurance coverage for the proposed salon.

Laws 1986, LB 318, § 83;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-3,122;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 346.